Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201854-7,105.01
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the
Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act:

(1) Accredited
veterinarian has the same meaning as in section 54-701.03;

(2) Animal has
the same meaning as in section 54-701.03;

(3) Animal welfare organization has the
same meaning as in section 54-2503;

(4) Certificate of veterinary inspection
means a legible document approved by the department, either paper copy or
electronic, issued by an accredited veterinarian at the point of origin of
an animal movement which records the (a) name and address of both consignor
and consignee, (b) purpose of animal's movement, (c) destination in the state
which includes the street address or enhanced-911 address of the premises,
(d) age, breed, sex, and number of animals in the shipment, (e) description
of the animals, (f) individual identification, when required, and (g) health
examination date of the animals. The certificate of veterinary inspection
is an acknowledgment by the accredited veterinarian of the apparent absence
of any infectious, dangerous, contagious, or otherwise transmissible disease
of any animal sold or offered for sale, purchased, bartered, or other change
of ownership at an exotic animal auction or exchange venue;

(5) Change of
ownership means the transfer within the State of Nebraska of possession or
control of an animal allowed to be transferred through consignment, sale,
purchase, barter, lease, exchange, trade, gift, or any other transfer of possession
or control at an exotic animal auction or exchange venue;

(6) Dangerous
disease has the same meaning as in section 54-701.03;

(7) Department means the
Department of Agriculture of the State of Nebraska;

(8) Domesticated cervine
animal has the same meaning as in section 54-701.03;

(9) Exotic animal means
any animal which is not commonly sold through licensed livestock auction markets
pursuant to the Livestock Auction Market Act. Such animals shall include,
but not be limited to, miniature cattle (bovine), miniature horses, miniature
donkeys, sheep (ovine), goats (caprine), alpacas (camelid), llamas (camelid),
pot-bellied pigs (porcine), and small mammals, with the exception of cats
of the Felis domesticus species and dogs of the Canis familiaris species.
The term also includes birds and poultry. The term does not include beef and
dairy cattle, calves, swine, bison, or domesticated cervine animals;

(10) Exotic animal
auction or exchange venue means any event or location, other than a livestock
auction market as defined in section 54-1158 or events by an animal welfare
organization or at an animal welfare organization location, where (a) an exotic
animal is consigned, purchased, sold, traded, bartered, given away, or otherwise
transferred, (b) an offer to purchase an exotic animal is made, (c) an exotic
animal is offered to be consigned, sold, traded, bartered, given away, or
otherwise transferred, or (d) any other event or location where there is a
change of ownership of an exotic animal;

(11) Exotic animal auction or exchange
venue organizer means a person in charge of organizing an exotic animal auction
or exchange venue event, and may include any person who: (a) Arranges events
for third parties to have private sales or trades of exotic animals; (b) organizes
or coordinates exotic animal auctions or exchange venues; (c) leases out areas
for exotic animal auctions or exchange venues; (d) provides or coordinates
other similar arrangements involving exotic animals at retail establishments
such as feed and supply stores, farm implement stores, and farm and ranch
stores, which allow such sales in or on the premises; or (e) takes exotic
animals for consignment on behalf of third parties;

(12) Officially identified
means the application of an official identification device or method approved
by the United States Department of Agriculture, Animal and Plant Health Inspection
Service, Veterinary Services; and

(13) Poultry has the same meaning as in
section 54-701.03.

Laws 2014, LB884, § 14.

Livestock Auction Market Act, see section 54-1156.